Missouri, session 2026, HB1685.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.355, to read as follows:
1.355. 1. The standard time in Missouri shall be the solar time of the ninetieth
meridian west of Greenwich, commonly known as central standard time.
2. This section shall not be construed to affect the standard time established by
United States law governing the movements of common carriers engaged in interstate
commerce or the time for performance of an act by an officer or department of the
United States as established by statute, lawful order, rule, or regulation of the United
States or an agency thereof.
3. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary by the United States
government relating to the adoption of daylight saving time by all of the states, the state
of Missouri elects to reject such time and elects to continue in force the terms of
subsection 1 of this section.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.